Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXII Levees, Drainage, and Reclamation of Lands
CHAPTER 267 Drainage and Reclamation Act of 1912

267.010.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the county board of drainage commissioners, or, in counties having seventy-five (75) or more separate drainage districts, or in counties availing themselves of the provisions of KRS 267.390(3)(b) and

267.490

as provided in KRS

267.495

, the drainage commissioner.

“District” means drainage or levee district.

“Improvement” means the construction, reconstruction, straightening, widening or deepening of any ditch, drain, canal, creek, levee or watercourse.

“Sheriff” includes any collecting officer.

“Viewers” means the board of viewers appointed by the county judge/executive.

The power to appoint includes the power to remove at any time.

History.

2380-1, 2380-2, 2380-6, 2380-7, 2380-32, 2380-34, 2380-37, 2380c-1: amend. Acts 1956, ch. 235, § 2; 1978, ch. 384, § 397, effective June 17, 1978.

267.015.
Compliance with KRS 65A.010 to 65A.090.

All boards established under this chapter shall comply with the provisions of KRS

65A.010

to

65A.090

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 40, § 76, effective March 21, 2013.

267.020.
Creation of drainage district.

A drainage district may be created in accordance with the procedures of KRS

65.810

for the purpose of draining or reclaiming low, swampy or overflowed land in the county, locate, establish and have constructed any levee, ditch, drain or canal, and have constructed, straightened, widened or deepened any ditch, drain, creek, or nonnavigable watercourse, and have reconstructed any ditch, drain, creek, levee or canal heretofore constructed under any drainage law.

History.

2380-1: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 398, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 64, § 17, effective July 13, 1984.

267.030.
Petition for improvement — Board of viewers — Report — Proceedings — Appeal — Establishment of district. [Repealed.]

267.040.
Board of viewers — Appointment — Oath. [Repealed].

267.050.
Examination and report of viewers — Petition dismissed if report unfavorable. [Repealed.]

267.060.
Proceeding on favorable viewers’ report. [Repealed.]

267.070.
Appeal from decision on exceptions. [Repealed.]

267.080.
Confirmation of report — Establishment of district. [Repealed.]

267.090.
Drainage directors — Election.

In every county where an improvement has been made under former laws or is made under this chapter, except those counties having seventy-five (75) or more separate drainage districts or those counties availing themselves of the provisions of KRS 267.390(3)(b) and

267.490

as provided in KRS

267.495

, the county judge/executive shall annually call an election in each district, to be held in the courthouse at the county seat on some day in May designated by him. At this election the taxpayers of each district shall elect a director to represent the district on the board of drainage commissioners. The county judge/executive shall preside at the election of each district, which shall be by viva voce vote of each member present at the hour designated by the county judge/executive. The districts of the county shall be numbered by the county judge/executive, and the elections shall take place in the numerical order of the districts. If any district is not represented at the election, the county judge/executive shall appoint a taxpayer of that district as director to represent the district. The county judge/executive shall fill all vacancies by appointment. The call for election shall be made at least ten (10) days before the election by posting notice at the courthouse door and by publication pursuant to KRS Chapter 424.

If the county judge/executive fails to carry out any of the provisions of this section, any five (5) taxpayers in any drainage district coming under the provisions of this chapter may call an election, and shall upon the day of the election designate one of their number to act in place of the county judge/executive, with all the rights of the county judge/executive under this section.

In counties having seventy-five (75) or more separate drainage districts or in counties availing themselves of the provisions of KRS 267.390(3)(b) and

267.490

as provided in KRS

267.495

, the provisions of KRS

267.010

and

267.490

shall be followed.

History.

2380-7, 2380c-1: amend. Acts 1956, ch. 235, § 3; 1966, ch. 239, § 180; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 6, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 404, effective June 17, 1978.

267.100.
Board of drainage commissioners created — Powers.

Except as provided in KRS

267.010

,

267.090

, and

267.490

, the directors from the various districts of the county shall constitute the county board of drainage commissioners, with the right to acquire, hold, encumber, sell and convey any property necessary to the conduct of its affairs, with all the rights and powers of a corporation, and with all other rights and powers necessary to carry out its work under the provisions of this chapter, including the right of eminent domain.

History.

2380-7.

267.110.
Officers of board.

Within fifteen (15) days after the election of the directors they shall meet at the county seat and elect a president and treasurer from their number, and a secretary who need not be from their number. If no secretary is elected, the county clerk shall be the ex officio secretary of the board. The president and directors shall receive no compensation for their services as such. The treasurer may receive a salary determined by the board, and shall execute bond as the board directs.

History.

2380-7.

267.120.
Meetings — Office — Records — Reports — Expenses.

The board shall meet when called by the president. The president shall call a meeting upon the written request of two (2) or more directors. The board shall have an office at the county seat, which shall be provided with all necessary furniture, stationery and records. The board shall keep complete records of its proceedings, which shall be at all times open to the inspection of the public.

By April 1 of each year the board shall make a complete report of its acts during the previous year, showing the amount of money received and from what source, and the amount paid out and for what purpose. The report shall be spread upon its records and be open for public inspection. By April 1 of each year the board shall publish pursuant to KRS Chapter 424 a financial statement of the previous year, showing the amounts received, the date of receipt and from what source, and the amounts paid out, the date of disbursement and for what purposes.

All expenses incurred by the board shall be taken out of drainage funds and not from any general funds of the county.

History.

2380-7: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 239, § 181.

267.130.
Drainage engineer — Powers — Duties — Assistants — Survey — Map — Report.

When the court refers to it any proceeding to establish or construct any improvement, the board shall employ a competent drainage engineer, who shall be the chief engineer for the work. The board may prescribe the number of assistant engineers to be selected by the chief engineer. The chief engineer shall have control of the work until completed, or until his removal by the board, and may assign portions to each assistant. He may, with the consent of the board, consult any eminent engineer and obtain his opinion or advice concerning the drainage of the district. He may employ such assistants as are necessary to make a complete topographical survey of the district, and shall enter upon the ground and make a survey of the main drains and all the laterals.

The line of each ditch, drain or levee shall be plainly and substantially marked on the ground. The course and distance of each ditch, and width of right-of-way, shall be carefully noted and sufficient notes made so that it may be accurately plotted and mapped. A line of levels shall be run for the entire work and sufficient data secured from which accurate profiles and plans may be made. Frequent bench marks shall be established along the line, on permanent objects, and their elevation recorded in the field books. Other levels may be run to determine the fall from one part of the district to another. If an old watercourse, ditch or channel is being altered it shall be accurately cross sectioned, so as to compute the amount of cubic yards saved by the use of the old channel. If a private ditch is utilized, the saving by reason of its use shall be carefully computed and reported, with the name of the owner. A drainage map of the district shall then be completed, showing the location of every improvement and the boundary, as closely as may be reasonably determined, of the lands owned by each individual landowner within the district. The location of any railroad or public highway and the boundary of any incorporated city within the district shall be shown on the map. There shall be prepared to accompany the map a profile showing the surface of the ground, and the bottom or grade of the proposed improvement.

The engineer shall make an estimate of the cost of the work, and plans and specifications therefor, and file the same, together with all maps and profiles, with the county clerk, to be made a part of the record of the proceedings. All such maps, profiles, plans and specifications, together with the report of the engineer and all exhibits filed therewith, shall be made in duplicate, one to be marked original and the other duplicate. If lands in counties other than the one in which the proceeding is pending are affected, an additional copy of the maps and profiles shall be made and filed with the county clerk of the other counties. The original shall not be withdrawn from the custody of the clerk, but the duplicate may be withdrawn for use by the viewers, the board, or for use on the work by the engineer or contractor. This material shall be receipted for by the person withdrawing it, and returned promptly.

History.

2380-8, 2380-17; 2019 ch. 44, § 31, effective June 27, 2019.

267.140.
Conference as to place and method of crossing railroad right-of-way.

Whenever the chief engineer makes a survey to locate a district or to change a natural watercourse that would cross the right-of-way of any railroad company the board shall serve written notice upon the local agent of the company, or its lessee or receiver, that the chief engineer or his assistant will meet the company at the place where the proposed improvement crosses the right-of-way of the company, at a time stated in the notice, at least ten (10) days after the service of the notice, to confer with the company concerning the place where and the manner in which the improvement shall cross the right-of-way. At this meeting, unless for good cause more time is agreed upon, the engineer and the railroad company shall agree, if possible, upon the place where and the manner and method in which the improvement shall cross the right-of-way. If the engineer and the railroad company cannot agree, or if the railroad company fails to confer with the engineer, he shall determine the place and manner of crossing the right-of-way, and shall specify the number and size of openings, and so state in his report.

History.

2380-8.

267.150.
Adoption of engineer’s report — Action of county judge/executive, clerk and viewers.

When the engineer’s report is filed, the board shall meet and receive and adopt it, with any modifications that may be determined upon, and shall notify the county judge/executive of its action. Within ten (10) days thereafter, the county judge/executive shall enter an order referring the proceedings to the original viewers for the purpose of assessing damages, and making classification of the land for assessment. The county clerk shall notify the viewers of the county judge/executive’s action, and set a day for them to meet at the county clerk’s office of the county in which the proceeding is pending. Unless the time is extended the viewers shall file their report within sixty (60) days from the time the proceedings are referred to them.

History.

2380-9: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 405, effective June 17, 1978.

267.160.
Viewers’ classification of land for assessment — Rate of assessment.

The viewers shall meet on the day named in the notice provided by KRS

267.150

, or as soon thereafter as practicable, and proceed with their work, for which the clerk shall furnish them with the duplicate plan of drainage adopted by the board. As soon after their first meeting as possible, the viewers shall examine the land in the district; the railroad property in the district; all other improvements, highways and bridges that may be affected by the proposed improvement; and all ditches, drains, ponds, lakes, creeks and watercourses in the district, or that are partly within and partly without the district. A majority of the viewers shall control and decide all questions.

The viewers shall classify the land in the district with reference to the benefit it will receive from the improvement. In the case of drainage, the degree of wetness of the land, its proximity to the ditch or a natural outlet and the fertility of the soil shall be considered in determining the amount of benefit it will receive by the construction of the ditch. Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the land benefited shall be separated into five classes. The land receiving the highest benefit shall be marked “Class A”; that receiving the next highest, “Class B”; that receiving the next highest, “Class C”; that receiving the next highest, “Class D”; and that receiving the smallest benefit, “Class E.” The holding of any one landowner need not be all in one class, but the number of acres in each class shall be ascertained, though its boundary need not be separately marked on the ground nor shown on the map. The total number of acres owned by one (1) person in each class and the total number of acres benefited shall be determined. The total number of acres of each class in the entire district shall be determined and presented in tabulated form. The scale of assessment to be made by the board upon the several classes of land returned by the viewers shall be in the ratio of five (5), four (4), three (3), two (2) and one (1). Whenever five (5) mills per acre are assessed against the land in “Class A,” four (4) mills per acre shall be assessed against the land in “Class B,” three (3) mills per acre in “Class C,” two (2) mills per acre in “Class D,” and one (1) mill per acre in “Class E.” This shall form the basis of the assessment of benefits to the land for drainage purposes, and in calculating the assessment against each landowner the board shall follow the classification.

If the viewers believe that existing conditions would cause substantial injustice to any landowner by strict conformity to the five-class rule, the classification may be changed by diminishing or increasing the number of classes to conform to such conditions, or the viewers may report the benefits they estimate will accrue to each tract of land without dividing the land into classes. If the classification is changed the viewers shall indicate to the board the ratio of assessment for such changed classification as compared with the five-class rule.

History.

2380-10.

267.170.
Report of viewers on classification — Estimate of cost of improvement.

The viewers shall keep an accurate account and report to the court the name of each person employed on the survey, the kind of work done, the number of days employed, any expenses that have been incurred in going to and from the work, and the cost of any supplies or material that have been used in making the survey. If the work is delayed by any good cause and the report is not completed at the time fixed by the court, the viewers shall appear before the court and state in writing the cause of such failure and ask for sufficient time to complete the work, whereupon the court shall set another date by which the report shall be completed and filed. The viewers shall not modify the adopted plan for drainage. The report shall contain a statement of the estimated cost of the works and improvements to be made in the district, a description of all the land in said district and the names of the owners thereof, and a general description of all the railroad rights-of-way, roadbeds and depot grounds, and the name of the corporation to which they belong at the date of the decree of the court organizing the district. The report shall also contain a statement of the estimated benefits per acre that will accrue to each class of land by reason of the proposed improvement, and each tract of land shall be assessed according to benefits as shown by the report.

History.

2380-10.

267.180.
Cost of construction and assessment of benefits when improvement crosses highway.

When any improvement crosses a public street or highway, the actual cost of constructing it across the street or highway, or removing old bridges or building new ones, shall be paid out of the fund of the drainage district. When any street or highway in the district is benefited by an improvement, the viewers shall assess and give in their report the amount of benefit to the street or highway, and process shall be issued against the county or city owning or controlling it. Such county or city shall have the right to appear before the court and file its exceptions the same as any landowner, and shall be liable for and shall pay the amount finally assessed against it, which may be recovered by suit in the name of the board.

History.

2380-11.

267.190.
Railroad property benefited shall be assessed.

The viewers shall assess the benefits that will accrue to the property of any railroad company by affording better drainage or a better outlet for drainage, but no benefits shall be assessed because of the increase in business that may come to any railroad company because of the improvement. The benefits shall be assessed at a fixed sum, determined solely by the physical benefit that its property will receive by the improvement. The viewers shall report it as a special assessment due personally from the railroad company. It may be collected like an ordinary debt. The county clerk shall issue process against the railroad company, and it shall have the same right to file exceptions and to appeal as individual landowners, but an appeal shall not delay or defeat the construction of the improvement.

History.

2380-12.

267.200.
Viewers shall assess damages.

The viewers shall assess the damages claimed by anyone that is justly right and due to him for property taken, injured or destroyed because of an improvement, or for any other legal damages sustained, including the actual estimated amount saved on account of private ditches utilized. Such damage shall be considered separate from any benefit the land would receive because of the proposed work, and shall be paid by the board when funds come into its hands. If any person agrees to waive the damages, the agreement shall be written and filed by the viewers with their report.

History.

2380-14.

267.210.
Viewers’ final report — Notice — Hearing.

When the final report of the viewers is completed and filed, it shall be examined by the county judge/executive, and if it is found to be legal and in due form it shall be accepted, and if not it may be referred back to the viewers with instructions to secure further information, to be reported at a subsequent date fixed by the county judge/executive. The chief engineer shall examine the report, and may recommend any changes in the plan of drainage for final adoption by the board. Such changes, when adopted, shall become a part of the plan. When the report is completed and accepted by the county judge/executive, with any changes in the plan adopted by the board, a date not less than twenty (20) days thereafter shall be fixed by the county judge/executive for the final hearing upon the report, and notice shall be given by publication pursuant to KRS chapter 424, and by posting a notice on the door of the courthouse in each county in which land affected is assessed, and at five (5) conspicuous places throughout the district. During this time a copy of the report shall be on file in the office of the county clerk in which the proceeding is pending, and shall be open to the inspection of any landowner or person interested within the district.

History.

2380-15: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 239, § 182; 1978, ch. 384, § 406, effective June 17, 1978.

267.220.
Court shall refer proceeding to board.

When the district is declared established, and the final report of the viewers approved or confirmed, the court shall refer the whole proceeding to the board for further proceedings.

History.

2380-18.

267.230.
Drainage record — Copy filed in any county affected.

The county clerk of each county shall provide a suitable record book to be known as the “drainage record,” in which he shall enter or copy every order, report, judgment or finding concerning the district. When land in any other county is affected, copies of all such records shall be made by the clerk, and they, together with a copy of all maps and profiles, shall be certified by him to the county clerk of the other county, where they shall be recorded in like manner.

History.

2380-17.

267.240.
Construction contract — Bond — Board may construct.

Upon final reference to it by the court of any drainage proceedings, the board shall give notice by publication pursuant to KRS Chapter 424 in the county in which the improvement is located, of the time and place of letting the work of construction and of the approximate amount of work to be done and the time fixed for its completion. On the date appointed for the letting the board, together with the chief engineer, shall convene and let the work to the lowest responsible bidder, either as a whole or in sections, as they may deem most advantageous for the district. No bid shall be entertained that exceeds the estimated cost unless for good reasons it is shown that the original estimate was erroneous. The board may reject all bids and advertise again, if it believes it will be in the interest of the district to do so. The board may employ persons and teams and lease, rent, hire or purchase machinery and equipment, and directly construct the improvement according to the plans and specifications, without letting a contract. The board may exercise the same power in cleaning out, straightening and reconstructing old public ditches, but the expense in any case shall not exceed the estimate of the drainage engineer for the work.

If the board accepts a bid, the successful bidder shall be required to enter into a contract with the board and to execute a bond for the faithful performance of such contract, with sufficient sureties, in favor of the board for the use and benefit of the district, in an amount equal to fifty percent (50%) of the estimated cost of the work awarded to him. The board may maintain action for breach of the contract against any contractor and the sureties on his bond, and in case of breach of the contract the work may be advertised and relet in the same manner as the original letting.

History.

2380-26, 2380-28: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 239, § 183; 1974, ch. 386, § 53.

267.250.
Payment for work in installments — Warrants.

The chief engineer in charge of construction shall make monthly estimates of the amount of work done, and furnish one (1) copy to the contractor and file the other with the secretary of the board. The board shall meet within five (5) days after the filing of such estimate, and if it approves the estimate it shall direct the secretary to draw a warrant in favor of the contractor for eighty percent (80%) of the work done, according to the specifications and contract. When the warrant, properly signed by the president and secretary, is presented to the treasurer of the drainage fund, he shall pay the amount due thereon out of any funds in his hands to the credit of that district. When the work is fully completed and accepted by the chief engineer, he shall make an estimate for the whole amount due, which shall then be paid from the drainage fund on warrants as above provided. If there are insufficient funds in the treasury to pay any warrant presented for payment, that fact shall be endorsed on the back of the warrant and the warrant shall thereafter draw interest at the rate of six percent (6%) per annum until there is money on hand sufficient to pay the warrant and accumulated interest.

History.

2380-27, 2380-47.

267.260.
Contractor’s right of access — Obstructions.

In the construction of the work the contractor may enter upon any land necessary for this purpose, and may remove any bridge or fence and cross private land in going to or from the work. If the right-of-way of the improvement is through timber, the owner may remove it before the work begins. If it is not removed by the landowner, it shall become the property of the contractor and may be removed by him. All logs, stumps and similar obstructions shall be cleared off the right-of-way for its full width by the contractor.

History.

2380-29.

267.270.
Method of construction when improvement crosses railroad property — Cost.

After the contract is let and the actual construction is commenced, if the work is being done with a floating dredge, the superintendent in charge of construction shall notify any railroad company of the probable time at which the contractor will be ready to enter upon its right-of-way and construct the work thereon. The railroad shall send a representative to view the ground with the superintendent of construction and arrange the exact time at which such work can most conveniently be done. At the agreed time the railroad company shall remove any obstructions necessary to permit the dredge to excavate the channel across its right-of-way. The work shall be so planned and conducted as to interfere in the least possible manner with the railroad’s business.

Within thirty (30) days after the work is completed, an itemized bill for the actual expense incurred by the railroad company for opening its tracks shall be made and presented to the superintendent of construction. This bill shall not include the cost of putting in a new bridge or strengthening or enlarging an old one. The superintendent of construction shall audit this bill, and if found correct shall approve and file it with the secretary of the board. The board shall deduct the cost of the excavation done by the dredge on the right-of-way of the railroad company at the contract price, and pay any difference to the railroad.

History.

2380-13.

267.280.
Condemnation of land not affected by drainage.

If it is necessary to acquire a right-of-way or any outlet over or through lands not affected by the drainage, and the same cannot be acquired by purchase, the same may be condemned by the board. The owners of the land sought to be condemned shall be made parties to the proceeding, and the procedure shall be substantially as provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky. The damages awarded shall be paid by the board out of the first funds available, before the land is taken, injured or destroyed, unless the party entitled thereto waives payment in advance.

History.

2380-16: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 100.

267.290.
Assessment roll and statement of cost — What to include.

After the classification of the land and the ratio of assessment of the different classes has been confirmed by the county judge/executive, the board shall prepare an assessment roll or drainage tax duplicate, giving a description of all the land in the district, the name of the owner, so far as can be ascertained from the public records, and the amount of assessment against each tract of land. In preparing this assessment roll the board shall ascertain the total cost of the improvement, including the damages awarded to the owners of land and private ditches, the costs of the proceeding and all wages paid or to be paid, including the wages of the treasurer and employees of the board, and shall deduct any special assessment made against any railroad or highway. The remainder shall be the amount to be paid by the land benefited. This amount shall be assessed against the land according to the benefit received, as shown by the classification and ratio of assessment made by the viewers and confirmed by the court. Attached to this drainage assessment roll or filed with it shall be a statement of the cost of the work to be done, including the damages awarded to the owners of land and private ditches, the costs of the proceeding, all wages, salaries and fees, including fees to attorneys, engineers and other agents, and all other expenses, with five percent (5%) in addition to meet any unforeseen contingencies. This drainage tax roll and statement of cost shall be made in duplicate and signed by the president and secretary of the board. One (1) copy shall be filed with the secretary of the board and the other with the county clerk in the county in which the proceeding is pending.

History.

2380-31: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 407, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 111, § 193, effective July 13, 1984.

267.300.
Hearing on assessment roll and statement — Notice — Appeal — Filing approved roll.

When the copies of the assessment roll and statement of costs are filed with the county clerk, the clerk shall give notice, by publication pursuant to KRS Chapter 424 in the county, of the filing of the assessment roll and statement, and that they will be heard on a date specified, which shall be not less than fifteen (15) nor more than thirty (30) days after the date of filing. The clerk shall also cause notices to be posted on the front door of the courthouse and in five (5) public places in the district more than ten (10) days prior to the hearing.

The county judge/executive shall hear in a summary way any objections to the cost of the improvement and to the assessment of land, and shall enter an order confirming the assessment roll or directing the board to change it in accordance with the finding of the court. No question or objection that could have been raised to the final report of the viewers or at any time before the filing of the assessment roll or statement of cost can be raised by exceptions to the assessment roll or statement of costs. The order of the county judge/executive shall be final and may be appealed from in the same manner as from orders confirming a report of the viewers.

The order shall direct the county clerk to certify to the county treasurer a copy of the assessment roll as filed by the board or as changed by the court. One (1) copy of the assessment roll shall be retained by the clerk and recorded as part of the drainage record. If land in any other county is assessed, another copy of the assessment roll so far as it relates to land in that county shall be filed with the county clerk of that county.

History.

2380-31: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 239, § 184; 1978, ch. 384, § 408, effective June 17, 1978.

267.310.
Payment and collection of assessments when average below twenty-five cents ($0.25) per acre.

If the total assessment against the land is less than an average of twenty-five cents ($0.25) per acre, the assessments shall be collected in one installment. In that case, after the assessment roll has been made out and one (1) copy delivered to the county treasurer, as provided in KRS

267.300

, notice thereof shall be given by publication pursuant to KRS Chapter 424, and by posting one (1) notice at the courthouse door in each county in which land assessed is located. At any time within thirty (30) days thereafter, any landowner may pay the assessment against his land to the treasurer, who shall enter proper credit on the assessment roll. After said thirty (30) days the board shall recover the assessment roll from the treasurer and deliver it to the sheriff, accompanied by an order to collect the unpaid assessments. The sheriff shall proceed to collect the assessments. If land in any other county is assessed, a copy of the assessment roll, insofar as it relates to that land, shall be certified to the sheriff of that county. The roll, when placed in the hands of the sheriff, shall have the same effect as a tax against the land assessed, and shall be collected in the same manner as state and county taxes, except that the sheriff shall add to each assessment shown the amount of his commission. If not paid by December 1 following the date of certification or order to collect, a penalty of six percent (6%) shall be added.

History.

2380-32: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 239, § 185.

267.320.
Bonds authorized when average assessment exceeds twenty-five cents ($0.25) per acre — Failure to pay assessment is consent to bonds.

If the total assessment exceeds the average of twenty-five cents ($0.25) per acre on all the land assessed, the board may give notice by publication pursuant to KRS Chapter 424, and by posting a notice at the door of the courthouse in each county in which land assessed is located, and at five (5) conspicuous places in the district, that it proposes to issue bonds for the construction of the improvement, giving the amount of bonds to be issued, the rate of interest they are to bear and the time when payable. Any landowner having land assessed in the district and not wanting to pay interest on the bonds may, within thirty (30) days after the publication of the notice, pay the county treasurer the full amount of his assessment and have his land released. If the landowner produces a treasurer’s receipt showing such payment, the county clerk or the secretary of the board shall indorse the release upon the assessment roll, and report to the board all releases made by him. This report shall be recorded on the record or minutes of the board. When the board is satisfied that any assessment has been paid it may order a release made.

Each person owning land assessed in the district who fails to pay the full amount of his assessment within thirty (30) days after publication of the notice shall be deemed to consent to the issuing of bonds, and in consideration of the right to pay his assessment in installments he thereby waives his right to any defense against the collection of the assessment because of any irregularity, illegality or defect in the proceeding prior to that time, except in the case of an appeal, which is not affected by this waiver.

History.

2380-32, 2380-33: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 239, § 186.

267.330.
Issuance and sale of bonds — Collection of assessment installments.

At the expiration of thirty (30) days after publication of the notice required by KRS

267.320

, the board may divide the unpaid assessments into annual installments, not less than two (2) nor more than thirty (30), which shall draw interest at the rate or rates or method of determining rates, payable at least annually, from thirty (30) days after the date of publication, and may issue bonds to anticipate their collection, which bonds shall mature in series to correspond with the installments into which the unpaid assessments are divided. The bonds shall draw interest at the rate or rates or method of determining rates, payable at least annually, as the board determines and be payable at some place designated by the board. The bonds shall be for the exclusive use and benefit of the district, and shall designate on their face the name of the district and the purpose for which they were issued. The board, in dividing the unpaid assessments into installments, shall fix the time for payment in each year so that each installment will be due at least one hundred and twenty days (120) before the bonds issued to anticipate the collection of that installment become due. Each landowner whose land is in lien for the payment of the bonds shall pay to the treasurer each installment due against his land, with all interest due at that time on that installment and deferred installments, on or before the time fixed by the board for the maturity of the installment.

On the first Monday after any installment is due, the board shall meet and ascertain the persons whose installments are in default, and shall, on that date, issue warrants to the sheriff directing him to collect those installments. The sheriff shall collect each installment with interest due on that and deferred installments, together with a penalty of six percent (6%), as state and county taxes are collected, and settle with the board within sixty (60) days from the date the installments were certified to him, and pay to the board the money collected.

All land upon which the money due on any installment has not been collected at the end of the said sixty (60) days shall be advertised and sold by the sheriff in the same manner as is provided in the case of state and county taxes. The sale shall be subject to the future installments of the assessments. At the expiration of ninety (90) days from the date of the original certification of the installment to the sheriff, he shall make final settlement with the board and pay to it all money in his hands. If he fails to do this the board may compel him to make settlement by rule against him issued by the court in which the proceeding is pending, after giving him five (5) days’ notice in writing. If any land is not purchased at the sale, the sheriff shall purchase it for the district, and in his final settlement with the board shall take a credit. The sheriff shall certify each sale to the county clerk, as required in the sale of land for state and county taxes, and the clerk shall record the sale in the land sale book kept by him. For collecting the assessments certified to him the sheriff shall be paid by the board the same fees allowed him for collecting state and county taxes and in the same manner. For recording the certificate of sale the clerk shall be paid the same fees allowed him by law for similar work in reference to state and county taxes. The owner of the land, or his representatives, heirs or assigns, may redeem the land from the sale in the manner and within the time provided for the redemption of land sold for state and county taxes. Any sheriff who fails to settle and pay off any installment with interest within the proper time shall be liable to the board for the full amount certified to him, with interest. This may be collected from the sheriff by rule issued against him by the court in which the proceeding is pending on five (5) days’ written notice. The sheriff shall be liable upon his bonds for his acts done and for the faithful performance of his duties under this section.

This section does not deprive the holder of any bond from having all rights by mandamus or otherwise against the board, the sheriff or any other officer or agent of the district having duties to perform under this section.

History.

2380-34: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 409, effective June 17, 1978; 1996, ch. 274, § 59, effective July 15, 1996.

267.340.
Refunding bonds.

Refunding bonds may be issued and sold, and assessments may be levied and collected to retire the refunding bonds, in the manner provided in KRS

269.010

to

269.050

.

History.

2380-34.